data/giellatekno/gt-norm-yamls/N-sinin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# This gold standard is automatically generated from the Votic dictionary
# at Språkbanken (https://spraakbanken.gu.se/karp/#?mode=votiska)

Tests:
  Noun - sinin :   # should decline like the paradigm 'asSinin'
    sinin+N+Sg+Nom: sinin
    sinin+N+Pl+Nom: sinized
    sinin+N+Sg+Gen: sinize
    sinin+N+Pl+Gen: sinizije
    sinin+N+Sg+Par: sinisse
    sinin+N+Pl+Par: [sinizii, siniziit]
    sinin+N+Sg+Ill: [sinize, sinizese]
    sinin+N+Pl+Ill: [sinizije, sinizise]
    sinin+N+Sg+Ine: sinizez
    sinin+N+Pl+Ine: siniziz
    sinin+N+Sg+Ela: sinizess
    sinin+N+Pl+Ela: siniziss
    sinin+N+Sg+All: sinizelle
    sinin+N+Pl+All: sinizille
    sinin+N+Sg+Ade: sinizell
    sinin+N+Pl+Ade: sinizill
    sinin+N+Sg+Abl: sinizelt
    sinin+N+Pl+Abl: sinizilt
    sinin+N+Sg+Tra: sinizessi
    sinin+N+Pl+Tra: sinizissi
    sinin+N+Sg+Ter: sinizeessaa
    sinin+N+Pl+Ter: siniziissaa
    sinin+N+Sg+Com: sinizeka
    sinin+N+Pl+Com: sinizika
